Illinois, session 104th, HB2484.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 3-109.1, 3-109.4, 3-124.1, and 7-109 and by 6adding Section 3-109.4 as follows: 7    (40 ILCS 5/3-109.1)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 3-109.1)8    Sec. 3-109.1. Chief of police. 9    (a) Beginning Except as provided in subsection (a-5), 10beginning January 1, 1990, any person who is employed as the 11chief of police of a "participating municipality" as defined 12in Section 7-106 of this Code, may elect to participate in the 13Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund rather than in a fund 14created under this Article 3. Except as provided in subsection 15(b), this election shall be irrevocable, and shall be filed in 16writing with the Board of the Illinois Municipal Retirement 17Fund.18    (a-5) On or after January 1, 2019, a person may not elect 19to participate in the Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund with 20respect to his or her employment as the chief of police of a 21participating municipality, unless that person became a 22participating employee in the Illinois Municipal Retirement 23Fund before January 1, 2019.   HB2484- 2 -LRB104 10783 RPS 20863 b1    (b) Until January 1, 1999, a chief of police who has 2elected under this Section to participate in IMRF rather than 3a fund created under this Article may elect to rescind that 4election and transfer his or her participation to the police 5pension fund established under this Article by the employing 6municipality. The chief must notify the boards of trustees of 7both funds in writing of his or her decision to rescind the 8election and transfer participation. A chief of police who 9transfers participation under this subsection (b) shall not be 10deemed ineligible to participate in the police pension fund by 11reason of having failed to apply within the 3-month period 12specified in Section 3-106.13(Source: P.A. 100-281, eff. 8-24-17.) 14    (40 ILCS 5/3-109.4)15    Sec. 3-109.4. Defined contribution plan for certain police 16officers.17    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, each 18Each municipality shall establish a defined contribution plan 19that aggregates police officer and employer contributions in 20individual accounts used for retirement. The defined 21contribution plan, including both police officer and employer 22contributions, established by the municipality must, at a 23minimum: meet the safe harbor provisions of the Internal 24Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; be a qualified plan under the 25Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and comply with all   HB2484- 3 -LRB104 10783 RPS 20863 b1other applicable laws, rules, and regulations. Contributions 2shall vest immediately upon deposit in the police officer's 3account.4    On and after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 5the 104th General Assembly, a municipality is not required to 6establish a defined contribution plan under this Section. 7However, a municipality is required to maintain a defined 8contribution plan for persons who began participating in the 9defined contribution plan before the effective date of this 10amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.11    A police officer who participates in the defined 12contribution plan under this Section may not earn creditable 13service or otherwise participate in the defined benefit plan 14offered by his or her employing municipality, except as an 15annuitant in another fund or as a survivor, while he or she is 16a participant in the defined contribution plan. The defined 17contribution plan under this Section shall not be construed to 18be a pension, annuity, or other defined benefit under this 19Code.20    (b) If a police officer who first became a police officer 21under this Article before the effective date of this 22amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and has more than 2310 years of creditable service in a fund enters active service 24with a different municipality, he or she may elect to 25participate in the defined contribution plan under this 26Section in lieu of the defined benefit plan if the   HB2484- 4 -LRB104 10783 RPS 20863 b1municipality has such a defined contribution plan.2    A police officer who has elected under this subsection to 3participate in the defined contribution plan may, in writing, 4rescind that election in accordance with the rules of the 5board. Any employer contributions, and the earnings thereon, 6shall remain vested in the police officer's account. A police 7officer who rescinds the election may begin participating in 8the defined benefit plan on the first day of the month 9following the rescission.10    (c) As used in this Section, "defined benefit plan" means 11the retirement plan available to police officers under this 12Article who do not participate in the defined contribution 13plan under this Section. 14(Source: P.A. 100-281, eff. 8-24-17.) 15    (40 ILCS 5/3-124.1)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 3-124.1)16    Sec. 3-124.1. Re-entry into active service. (a) If a 17police officer who is receiving pension payments other than as 18provided in Section 3-109.3 re-enters active service, pension 19payment shall be suspended while he or she is in service. When 20he or she again retires, pension payments shall be resumed. If 21the police officer remains in service after re-entry for a 22period of less than 5 years, the pension shall be the same as 23upon first retirement. If the officer's service after re-entry 24is at least 5 years and the officer makes the required 25contributions during the period of re-entry, his or her   HB2484- 5 -LRB104 10783 RPS 20863 b1pension shall be recomputed by taking into account the 2additional period of service and salary.3    (b) If a police officer who first becomes a member on or 4after January 1, 2019 but before the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly is receiving 6pension payments (other than as provided in Section 3-109.3) 7and re-enters active service with any municipality that has 8established a pension fund under this Article, that police 9officer may continue to receive pension payments while he or 10she is in active service, but shall only participate in a 11defined contribution plan established by the municipality 12pursuant to Section 3-109.4, if the municipality has 13established such a defined contribution plan, and may not 14establish creditable service in the pension fund established 15by that municipality or have his or her pension recomputed. 16(Source: P.A. 100-281, eff. 8-24-17.) 17    (40 ILCS 5/7-109)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-109)18    Sec. 7-109. Employee. 19    (1) "Employee" means any person who:20        (a) 1. Receives earnings as payment for the 21    performance of personal services or official duties out of 22    the general fund of a municipality, or out of any special 23    fund or funds controlled by a municipality, or by an 24    instrumentality thereof, or a participating 25    instrumentality, including, in counties, the fees or   HB2484- 6 -LRB104 10783 RPS 20863 b1    earnings of any county fee office; and2        2. Under the usual common law rules applicable in 3    determining the employer-employee relationship, has the 4    status of an employee with a municipality, or any 5    instrumentality thereof, or a participating 6    instrumentality, including alderpersons, county 7    supervisors and other persons (excepting those employed as 8    independent contractors) who are paid compensation, fees, 9    allowances or other emolument for official duties, and, in 10    counties, the several county fee offices.11        (b) Serves as a township treasurer appointed under the 12    School Code, as heretofore or hereafter amended, and who 13    receives for such services regular compensation as 14    distinguished from per diem compensation, and any regular 15    employee in the office of any township treasurer whether 16    or not his earnings are paid from the income of the 17    permanent township fund or from funds subject to 18    distribution to the several school districts and parts of 19    school districts as provided in the School Code, or from 20    both such sources; or is the chief executive officer, 21    chief educational officer, chief fiscal officer, or other 22    employee of a Financial Oversight Panel established 23    pursuant to Article 1H of the School Code, other than a 24    superintendent or certified school business official, 25    except that such person shall not be treated as an 26    employee under this Section if that person has negotiated   HB2484- 7 -LRB104 10783 RPS 20863 b1    with the Financial Oversight Panel, in conjunction with 2    the school district, a contractual agreement for exclusion 3    from this Section.4        (c) Holds an elective office in a municipality, 5    instrumentality thereof or participating instrumentality.6    (2) "Employee" does not include persons who:7        (a) Are eligible for inclusion under any of the 8    following laws:9            1. "An Act in relation to an Illinois State 10        Teachers' Pension and Retirement Fund", approved May 11        27, 1915, as amended;12            2. Articles 15 and 16 of this Code.13        However, such persons shall be included as employees 14    to the extent of earnings that are not eligible for 15    inclusion under the foregoing laws for services not of an 16    instructional nature of any kind.17        However, any member of the armed forces who is 18    employed as a teacher of subjects in the Reserve Officers 19    Training Corps of any school and who is not certified 20    under the law governing the certification of teachers 21    shall be included as an employee.22        (b) Are designated by the governing body of a 23    municipality in which a pension fund is required by law to 24    be established for policemen or firemen, respectively, as 25    performing police or fire protection duties, except that 26    when such persons are the heads of the police or fire   HB2484- 8 -LRB104 10783 RPS 20863 b1    department and are not eligible to be included within any 2    such pension fund, they shall be included within this 3    Article; provided, that such persons shall not be excluded 4    to the extent of concurrent service and earnings not 5    designated as being for police or fire protection duties. 6    However, (i) any head of a police department who was a 7    participant under this Article immediately before October 8    1, 1977 and did not elect, under Section 3-109 of this Act, 9    to participate in a police pension fund shall be an 10    "employee", and (ii) any chief of police who became a 11    participating employee under this Article before January 12    1, 2019 and who elects to participate in this Fund under 13    Section 3-109.1 of this Code, regardless of whether such 14    person continues to be employed as chief of police or is 15    employed in some other rank or capacity within the police 16    department, shall be an employee under this Article for so 17    long as such person is employed to perform police duties 18    by a participating municipality and has not lawfully 19    rescinded that election.20        (b-5) Were not participating employees under this 21    Article before August 26, 2018 (the effective date of 22    Public Act 100-1097) and participated as a chief of police 23    in a fund under Article 3 and return to work in any 24    capacity with the police department, with any oversight of 25    the police department, or in an advisory capacity for the 26    police department with the same municipality with which   HB2484- 9 -LRB104 10783 RPS 20863 b1    that pension was earned, regardless of whether they are 2    considered an employee of the police department or are 3    eligible for inclusion in the municipality's Article 3 4    fund. 5        (c) Are contributors to or eligible to contribute to a 6    Taft-Hartley pension plan to which the participating 7    municipality is required to contribute as the person's 8    employer based on earnings from the municipality. Nothing 9    in this paragraph shall affect service credit or 10    creditable service for any period of service prior to July 11    16, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-712), and 12    this paragraph shall not apply to individuals who are 13    participating in the Fund prior to July 16, 2014 (the 14    effective date of Public Act 98-712). 15        (d) Become an employee of any of the following 16    participating instrumentalities on or after January 1, 17    2017 (the effective date of Public Act 99-830): the 18    Illinois Municipal League; the Illinois Association of 19    Park Districts; the Illinois Supervisors, County 20    Commissioners and Superintendents of Highways Association; 21    an association, or not-for-profit corporation, membership 22    in which is authorized under Section 85-15 of the Township 23    Code; the United Counties Council; or the Will County 24    Governmental League. 25        (e) Are members of the Board of Trustees of the 26    Firefighters' Pension Investment Fund, as created under   HB2484- 10 -LRB104 10783 RPS 20863 b1    Article 22C of this Code, in their capacity as members of 2    the Board of Trustees of the Firefighters' Pension 3    Investment Fund. 4        (f) Are members of the Board of Trustees of the Police 5    Officers' Pension Investment Fund, as created under 6    Article 22B of this Code, in their capacity as members of 7    the Board of Trustees of the Police Officers' Pension 8    Investment Fund. 9    (3) All persons, including, without limitation, public 10defenders and probation officers, who receive earnings from 11general or special funds of a county for performance of 12personal services or official duties within the territorial 13limits of the county, are employees of the county (unless 14excluded by subsection (2) of this Section) notwithstanding 15that they may be appointed by and are subject to the direction 16of a person or persons other than a county board or a county 17officer. It is hereby established that an employer-employee 18relationship under the usual common law rules exists between 19such employees and the county paying their salaries by reason 20of the fact that the county boards fix their rates of 21compensation, appropriate funds for payment of their earnings 22and otherwise exercise control over them. This finding and 23this amendatory Act shall apply to all such employees from the 24date of appointment whether such date is prior to or after the 25effective date of this amendatory Act and is intended to 26clarify existing law pertaining to their status as   HB2484- 11 -LRB104 10783 RPS 20863 b1participating employees in the Fund.2(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 102-637, eff. 8-27-21; 3102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)